District of Columbia statutes.
16-5308

Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, approved June 30, 2000 (114 Stat. 464; 15 U.S.C. § 7001 et seq.), but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7001(c) ), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act (15 U.S.C. § 7003(b) ).

July 23, 2010, D.C. Law 18-191, § 2(b), 57 DCR 3400
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Unsworn Foreign Declarations Act.